Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6845
Medically necessary, defined.

Medically necessary means a health care service that a health care provider, exercising his or her prudent clinical judgment, would provide to a covered person for the purpose of evaluating, diagnosing, or treating an illness, an injury, or a disease, or its symptoms, and that is in accordance with the generally accepted standards of medical practice; that is clinically appropriate, in terms of type, frequency, extent, site, and duration, and considered effective for the covered person's illness, injury, or disease; that is not primarily for the convenience of the covered person or the health care provider; and that is not more costly than an alternative service or sequence of services at least as likely to produce equivalent therapeutic or diagnostic results as to the diagnosis or treatment of that covered person's illness, injury, or disease.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 12.